Utah statutes.
41-6a-1105.   Operation of bicycle or moped on and use of roadway -- Duties, prohibitions.

(1)  A person operating a bicycle or a moped on a roadway at less than the normal speed of traffic at the time and place and under the conditions then existing shall ride as near as practicable to the right-hand edge of the roadway except when:

(a)  overtaking and passing another bicycle or vehicle proceeding in the same direction;

(b)  preparing to make a left turn at an intersection or into a private road or driveway;

(c)  traveling straight through an intersection that has a right-turn only lane that is in conflict with the straight through movement; or

(d)  reasonably necessary to avoid conditions that make it unsafe to continue along the right-hand edge of the roadway including:

(i)  fixed or moving objects;

(ii)  parked or moving vehicles;

(iii)   bicycles;

(iv)  pedestrians;

(v)  animals;

(vi)  surface hazards; or

(vii)  a lane that is too narrow for a bicycle and a vehicle to travel safely side by side within the lane.

(2)  A person operating a bicycle or moped on a highway shall operate in the designated direction of traffic.

(3) (a)  A person riding a bicycle or moped on a roadway may not ride more than two abreast with another person except on paths or parts of roadways set aside for the exclusive use of bicycles. 

(b)  If allowed under Subsection (3)(a), a person riding two abreast with another person may not impede the normal and reasonable movement of traffic and shall ride within a single lane.

(4)  If a usable path for bicycles has been provided adjacent to a roadway, a bicycle rider may be directed by a traffic-control device to use the path and not the roadway.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

